Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1905.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


The Legislature finds and declares that all transgender-


associated procedures, medications, treatments, hormones, and


pharmaceuticals are elective, non-medically necessary, experimental,


unethical, and recreational, except for counseling directed toward


aligning the patient with his or her biological sex at birth, and


that such procedures constitute physician-assisted mutilation


punishable by criminal prosecution for violating the Hippocratic


Oath’s mandate to “do no harm”.

Req. No. 3509 Page 1


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2607.2 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. No person including, but not limited to, a physician or


other health care provider shall provide transgender-associated


procedures, medications, treatments, hormones, or pharmaceuticals to


any person in this state.


B. Subsection A of this section shall not apply to treatment of


gender dysphoria solely as a mental health condition aimed at


reconciling the patient with his or her biological sex at birth.


C. Any person who violates this section shall, upon conviction,


be guilty of a felony.


D. A physician or other health care provider who violates this


section shall be liable for malpractice and shall be subject to


disciplinary action by the appropriate licensure board.


E. The Attorney General may criminally prosecute violations of


this section and may bring civil actions to enforce this section.


F. No public or private health care payor in this state


including, but not limited to, the state Medicaid program, the state


employee health plan, or a commercial insurance plan, shall cover or


reimburse for any transgender-associated procedures, medications,


treatments, hormones, or pharmaceuticals, except for treatment


described in subsection B of this section. No state agency,


officer, or employee shall provide funding through a program,

Req. No. 3509 Page 2


contract, or other means to any person or entity that provides


transgender-associated procedures, medications, treatments,


hormones, or pharmaceuticals.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3509 DC 1/15/2026 8:42:59 AM































Req. No. 3509 Page 3